Idaho statutes. Title 63 REVENUE AND TAXATION
Chapter 30 INCOME TAX
§ 63-3022H. Deduction of capital gains.

If an individual taxpayer reports capital gain net income in determining Idaho taxable income, eighty percent (80%) in taxable year 2001 and sixty percent (60%) in taxable years thereafter of the capital gain net income from the sale or exchange of qualified property shall be a deduction in determining Idaho taxable income.

The deduction provided in this section is limited to the amount of the capital gain net income from all property included in taxable income. Gains treated as ordinary income by the Internal Revenue Code do not qualify for the deduction allowed in this section. The deduction otherwise allowable under this section shall be reduced by the amount of any federal capital gains deduction relating to such property, but not below zero.

Property held by an estate, trust, S corporation, partnership, limited liability company or an individual is “qualified property” under this section if the property had an Idaho situs at the time of sale and is:

Real property held at least twelve (12) months;

Tangible personal property used in Idaho for at least twelve (12) months by a revenue-producing enterprise;

Cattle or horses held for breeding, draft, dairy or sporting purposes for at least twenty-four (24) months in Idaho;

Breeding livestock other than cattle or horses held at least twelve (12) months in Idaho;

Timber grown in Idaho and held at least twenty-four (24) months;

A partnership interest, other than a publicly traded partnership as defined by section 7704(b) of the Internal Revenue Code, held by an individual for at least twelve (12) months, but only to the extent the gain from sale or exchange of the interest is attributable to real property held by the partnership that is classified as a capital asset by section 1221 of the Internal Revenue Code and is qualified real property under paragraph (a) of this subsection. If the partnership holds property in addition to qualified real property, the portion of the capital gain attributable to qualified real property shall be determined under one (1) of the following methods at the option of the taxpayer:

Fair market valuation. The capital gain from the sale or exchange of the interest attributable to qualified real property is the amount by which the fair market value of the qualified real property exceeds the adjusted basis of the qualified real property minus any gain taxable as ordinary income. For purposes of this section, fair market value must be established by:

A qualified appraisal as defined in 26 CFR 1.170A-13(c)(3);

A county assessor valuation; or

Other evidence acceptable to the state tax commission; or

Adjusted basis allocation. The capital gain from the sale or exchange of the interest attributable to qualified real property is the proportion of the capital gain included in Idaho taxable income that the adjusted basis of qualified real property held by the partnership on the date of sale or exchange of the partnership interest bears to the adjusted basis of all property held by the partnership at least twelve (12) months prior to the date of sale or exchange of the partnership interest. For this purpose, the adjusted basis shall be determined as provided in section 63-3022O, Idaho Code.
(4) In determining the period for which property subject to this section has been held by a taxpayer, the provisions of section 1223 of the Internal Revenue Code shall apply, except that the holding period shall not include the holding period of property given up in an exchange, when such property would not have constituted qualified property under this section without regard to meeting the holding period nor shall the holding period include any time period in which the property subject to this section was held by a corporation other than an S corporation. Notwithstanding the preceding sentence, the holding period of qualifying property that was distributed by an S corporation or an entity treated as a partnership to a person who was an owner, member or partner at the time of the distribution shall, for that person, include the amount of time that the S corporation or the entity held the property, regardless of whether the distribution was a liquidating distribution.

(5) As used in this section, “revenue-producing enterprise” means:

(a) The production, assembly, fabrication, manufacture, or processing of any agricultural, mineral or manufactured product;

(b) The storage, warehousing, distribution, or sale at wholesale of any products of agriculture, mining or manufacturing;

(c) The feeding of livestock at a feedlot;

(d) The operation of laboratories or other facilities for scientific, agricultural, animal husbandry, or industrial research, development, or testing.

(6) As used in this section, the term “real property” means land and includes the following:

(a) A “qualified conservation easement,” as defined in section 2031(c)(8)(B) of the Internal Revenue Code, conveyed to a “qualified organization” as defined in section 170(h) of the Internal Revenue Code;

(b) Grazing permits or leases issued by the U.S. forest service, the bureau of land management or the Idaho department of lands, if such permit is transferred simultaneously with the transfer of the “base property”; and

(c) Any other property defined in section 1250(c) of the Internal Revenue Code as “section 1250 property” conveyed in perpetuity, the transfer of which would be required to be in writing by section 9-503, Idaho Code.

(7) Property that has been depreciated pursuant to section 1245 of the Internal Revenue Code is not eligible to be treated as real property for purposes of this deduction.

(8) Part-year resident and nonresident owners of multistate entities shall compute the allowable deduction as prescribed in the rules of the state tax commission.

§ 63-3022I. Adoption expenses.

For taxable years commencing on or after January 1, 2018, legal fees and costs and medical expenses and costs all related to the adoption of a child may be deducted from taxable income by adoptive parents. The deduction allowed pursuant to this section shall not exceed ten thousand dollars ($10,000) for the legal fees and costs and medical expenses and costs incurred in the adoption, or the actual costs of the legal fees and costs and medical expenses and costs incurred in the adoption, whichever amount is less, which amount may not include travel costs.

§ 63-3022J. Deduction of value for technological equipment.

Any individual or corporation may deduct from taxable income an amount equal to the fair market value of technological equipment donated to public elementary or public secondary schools, private elementary or private secondary schools, public universities, private universities, public colleges, private colleges, public community colleges, private community colleges, public technical colleges or private technical colleges, or public libraries and library districts located within the state of Idaho, except that the amount of the deduction shall not exceed the amount of the taxpayer’s cost of the technological equipment donated nor reduce Idaho taxable income to less than zero. The deduction allowed pursuant to this section shall be in addition to any other deduction allowed pursuant to this chapter. In order to take the deduction pursuant to this section, the taxpayer shall receive a written statement from the donee in which the donee agrees to accept the technological equipment donated.

For the purposes of this section, “technological equipment” means a computer, computer software, scientific equipment or apparatus to be used by the university, college, community college, technical college, school or library directly or indirectly in the education program of the university, college, community college, technical college, school or library and which is donated to the university, college, community college, technical college, school or library no later than five (5) years after its manufacture has been substantially completed.

For the purposes of this section, a public elementary or public secondary school means one that is located within this state and receives funding pursuant to chapter 10, title 33, Idaho Code.

For purposes of this section, a private elementary or private secondary school means one that is located within this state and is operated on a nonprofit basis.

For the purposes of this section, a public library or library district means one that is located within this state and receives funding pursuant to chapters 26 and 27, title 33, Idaho Code.

For purposes of this section, a public university, public college, public community college or public technical college means one that is located within this state and receives an appropriation from the legislature.

For purposes of this section, a private university, private college, private community college or private technical college means one that is located within this state and is operated on a nonprofit basis.

The state tax commission shall promulgate rules to administer the provisions of this section. The rules shall be promulgated in compliance with chapter 52, title 67, Idaho Code.

§ 63-3022K. Medical savings account.

For taxable years commencing on and after January 1, 1995, annual contributions to a medical savings account not exceeding two thousand dollars ($2,000) for the account holder and interest earned on a medical savings account shall be deducted from taxable income by the account holder, if such amount has not been previously deducted or excluded in arriving at taxable income. For married individuals the maximum deduction shall be computed separately for each individual. Contributions to the account shall not exceed the amount deductible under this section.

For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2014, the annual contributions to a medical savings account shall be limited to ten thousand dollars ($10,000). Both interest earned and all contributions to medical savings accounts shall be deducted from taxable income by the account holder, if such amount has not been previously deducted or excluded in arriving at taxable income.

For the purpose of this section, the following terms have the following meanings unless the context clearly denotes otherwise:

“Account holder” means an individual, in the case of married individuals each spouse, including a self-employed person, on whose behalf the medical savings account is established.

“Dependent” means a person for whom a deduction is permitted under section 151(b) or (c) of the Internal Revenue Code if a deduction for the person is claimed for that person on the account holder’s Idaho income tax return.

“Dependent child” means a child or grandchild of the account holder who is not a dependent if the account holder actually pays the eligible medical expenses of the child or grandchild and the child or grandchild is any of the following:

Under twenty-one (21) years of age, or enrolled as a full-time student at an accredited college or university.

Legally entitled to the provision of proper or necessary subsistence, education, medical care or other care necessary for his or her health, guidance or well-being and not otherwise emancipated, self-supporting, married or a member of the armed forces of the United States.

Mentally or physically incapacitated to the extent that he or she is not self-sufficient.

“Depository” means a state or national bank, savings and loan association, credit union or trust company authorized to act as a fiduciary or an insurance administrator or insurance company authorized to do business in this state, a broker or investment advisor regulated by the department of finance, a broker or insurance agent regulated by the department of insurance or a health maintenance organization, fraternal benefit society, hospital and professional service corporation as defined in section 41-3403, Idaho Code, or nonprofit mutual insurer regulated under title 41, Idaho Code.

“Eligible medical expense” means an expense paid by the taxpayer for medical care described in section 213(d) of the Internal Revenue Code, and long-term care expenses of the account holder and the spouse, dependents and dependent children of the account holder.

“Long-term care expenses” means expenses incurred in providing custodial care in a nursing facility as defined in section 39-1301, Idaho Code, and for insurance premiums relating to long-term care insurance under chapter 46, title 41, Idaho Code.
(g) “Medical savings account” means an account established with a depository to pay the eligible medical expenses of the account holder and the dependents and dependent children of the account holder. Medical savings accounts shall carry the name of the account holder, a designated beneficiary or beneficiaries of the account holder and shall be designated by the depository as a “medical savings account.”

Upon agreement between an employer and employee, an employer may establish and contribute to the employee’s medical savings account or contribute to an employee’s existing medical savings account. For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 1995, but before January 1, 2014, the total combined annual contributions by an employer and the account holder shall not exceed two thousand dollars ($2,000) for the account holder. Employer contributions to an employee’s medical savings account shall be owned by the employee.

Funds held in a medical savings account may be withdrawn by the account holder at any time. Withdrawals for the purpose of paying eligible medical expenses shall not be subject to the tax imposed in this chapter. Funds held in a medical savings account must be exhausted before the account holder, the account holder’s dependent or the account holder’s dependent child receives any state assistance for medical care. The burden of proving that a withdrawal from a medical savings account was made for an eligible medical expense is upon the account holder and not upon the depository or the employer of the account holder. Other withdrawals shall be subject to the following restrictions and penalties:

There shall be a distribution penalty for withdrawal of funds by the account holder for purposes other than the payment of eligible medical expenses. The penalty shall be ten percent (10%) of the amount of withdrawal from the account and, in addition, the amount withdrawn shall be subject to the tax imposed in this chapter. The direct transfer of funds from a medical savings account to a medical savings account at a different depository shall not be considered a withdrawal for purposes of this section. Charges relating to the administration and maintenance of the account by the depository are not withdrawals for purposes of this section.

After an account holder reaches fifty-nine and one-half (59 1/2) years of age, withdrawals may be made for eligible medical expenses or for any other reason without penalty, but subject to the tax imposed by this section.

Upon the death of an account holder, the account principal, as well as any interest accumulated thereon, shall be distributed without penalty to the designated beneficiary or beneficiaries.

Funds withdrawn which are later reimbursed shall be taxable unless redeposited into the account within sixty (60) days of the reimbursement. Deposits of reimbursed eligible medical expenses shall not be included in calculating the amount deductible.

Funds deposited in a medical savings account which are deposited in error or unintentionally and which are withdrawn within thirty (30) days of being deposited shall be treated as if the amounts had not been deposited in the medical savings account. Funds withdrawn from a medical savings account which are withdrawn in error or unintentionally and which are redeposited within thirty (30) days of being withdrawn shall be treated as if the amounts had not been withdrawn from the medical savings account.

Funds withdrawn which are, not later than the sixtieth day after the day of the withdrawal, deposited into another medical savings account for the benefit of the same account holder are not a withdrawal for purposes of this section and shall not be included in calculating the amount deductible.
(6) Reporting. Depositories, in the case of medical savings accounts, shall provide to the state tax commission, in the routine fashion used for all interest-bearing accounts, the same information that is provided for any interest-bearing bank account. So as to minimize the burden of reporting, the information shall be provided in the format in which information is provided for any interest-bearing bank account to the state tax commission. There shall be no other reporting requirements. Account holders shall provide on any state income tax form in which they take a deduction for a medical savings account the account number of their medical savings account and the depository at which the account is held.

Such account shall cease to be a medical savings account as of the date of death; and

An amount equal to the fair market value of the assets in such account on such date shall be includable, if such person is not the estate of such holder, in such person’s Idaho taxable income for the taxable year which includes such date, or if such person is the estate of such holder, in such holder’s Idaho taxable income for the last taxable year of such holder.

(7) Any medical care savings account established pursuant to chapter 53, title 41, Idaho Code, as enacted by chapter 186, laws of 1994, may be continued pursuant to the provisions of this section and all duties, privileges and liabilities imposed in this section upon account holders of medical care savings accounts and the beneficiaries of those accounts shall apply to account holders of medical care savings accounts and their beneficiaries established pursuant to chapter 53, title 41, Idaho Code, as enacted by chapter 186, laws of 1994, as if the medical care savings account were a medical savings account established pursuant to this section.

(8)(a) If the account holder’s surviving spouse acquires the account holder’s interest in a medical savings account by reason of being the designated beneficiary of such account at the death of the account holder, the medical savings account shall be treated as if the spouse were the account holder.

(b) If, by reason of the death of the account holder, any person acquires the account holder’s interest in a medical savings account in a case to which subsection (8)(a) of this section does not apply:

(c) The amount includable in Idaho taxable income under subsection (8)(b) of this section by any person, other than the estate, shall be reduced by the amount of qualified medical expenses which were incurred by the decedent before the date of the decedent’s death and paid by such person within one (1) year after such date.

§ 63-3022L. Individuals who are owners of an interest in a pass-through entity or beneficiaries of a trust or estate.

Individuals who are not a resident of Idaho as defined in section 63-3014, Idaho Code, but who are owners of an interest in a pass-through entity, as defined in section 63-3006C, Idaho Code, transacting business in Idaho or who are beneficiaries of a trust or estate with income taxable in Idaho may have Idaho tax relating to income described in subsection (2) of this section reported and paid by the pass-through entity on a return, referred to in this section as a “composite return.” Income subject to this subsection shall be taxed at the rate applicable to corporations. The option to file a composite return and pay tax for nonresident owners is in lieu of the backup withholding requirements of section 63-3036B, Idaho Code.

The provisions of subsection (1) of this section apply to the share of any income, loss, deduction or credit of a pass-through entity required to be included on such individual’s Idaho return.

For purposes of subsection (2) of this section, deductions, loss and credits allowed in computing the tax liability and income attributable to the individual owner shall be prescribed in the rules of the state tax commission pursuant to section 63-3026A, Idaho Code.

If a corporation, partnership, trust or estate transacting business in Idaho does not comply with the provisions of section 63-3036B, Idaho Code, and also fails to file an Idaho income tax return reporting all of the items described in subsection (2) of this section or fails to pay any tax due thereon, such corporation, partnership, trust or estate shall be liable for tax on such items at the rate applicable to corporations. An entity may rely upon information provided by the individual indicating state of residency, as prescribed in the rules of the state tax commission.

A pass-through entity that files a composite return as described in subsection (1) of this section shall include a statement with the return showing, and report on the K-1 to each individual whose income is included in the return, each individual’s share of the income reported on the return and the tax paid by the pass-through entity on each individual’s share of the income reported on the return. The statement shall be made on a form prescribed by the state tax commission and shall contain any other information required by it. If the individual filed an Idaho return, the individual shall include the income shown on the K-1 to that individual and shall be entitled to a credit for the tax paid by the entity on such income shown on the K-1 to that individual.

“Individual” for purposes of this section means a:

Natural person;

Grantor trust as described in sections 673 through 677 or section 678 of the Internal Revenue Code;

Qualified subchapter S trust as described in section 1361(d) (3) of the Internal Revenue Code; or

§ 63-3022M. Expenses and interest relating to tax exempt income.

For taxable years commencing on and after January 1, 1999:

Add interest and dividends received or accrued during the taxable year from foreign securities and from securities issued by states and other political subdivisions exempt from federal income tax under the Internal Revenue Code, less applicable amortization.

Subtract any expenses and interest not allowed under sections 265 and 291 of the Internal Revenue Code in computing taxable income, as defined in section 63-3011B, Idaho Code, for interest on indebtedness incurred or continued to purchase or to carry obligations the interest of which is not subject to the taxes imposed under the Internal Revenue Code.

Subtract interest and dividends received or accrued during the taxable year from securities issued:

By the federal government and its instrumentalities to the extent included in taxable income and not subject to taxation by this state, and

By the state of Idaho, its cities and political subdivisions, exempt from federal income tax under the Internal Revenue Code.

No deduction shall be allowed for interest on indebtedness incurred or continued to purchase or to carry obligations the interest of which is not subject to the taxes imposed under this chapter. The amount of interest on indebtedness thus incurred or continued shall be an amount which bears the same ratio to the aggregate amount allowable to the taxpayer as a deduction for interest for the taxable year as the taxpayer’s interest income from the obligations mentioned in the preceding sentence bears to the taxpayer’s total income for the taxable year. “Aggregate amount allowable” means the taxpayer’s total interest expense deducted in determining taxable income as defined in section 63-3011B, Idaho Code, plus interest expense disallowed under sections 265 and 291 of the Internal Revenue Code, plus interest expense from a pass-through entity, plus the interest expense of a foreign corporation that, pursuant to sections 63-3027 and 63-3027B through 63-3027E, Idaho Code, is included in a combined report with the taxpayer less interest expense of any corporation included with the taxpayer in a consolidated federal return but not a part of the combined report filed with the state tax commission for the same taxable year. The deduction under this subsection shall not exceed the amount of interest and dividend income added pursuant to subsection (1) of this section less interest and dividend income from the state of Idaho, its cities and political subdivisions, subtracted pursuant to subsection (3) of this section.

No deduction shall be allowed for expenses (other than interest) attributable to interest or dividend income which is not subject to the taxes imposed under this chapter.

§ 63-3022N. Marriage penalty adjustment.

To eliminate from the calculation of Idaho taxable income any marriage penalty that may exist in the basic standard deductions provided in the Internal Revenue Code, basic federal standard deductions shall be adjusted as provided in this section.

As used in this section, “the marriage penalty” means the difference obtained by subtracting:

The basic standard deduction for joint returns, from

Two (2) times the basic standard deduction for an individual who is not married and who is not a surviving spouse or head of household.

For each taxable year beginning on and after January 1, 2000, the standard deduction in section 63-3022(j)(1), Idaho Code, shall be: on a joint return, the basic federal joint standard deduction plus the marriage penalty, rounded to the nearest dollar, plus the amount of any additional standard deduction for the aged or blind for which a taxpayer may qualify under section 63 of the Internal Revenue Code.

The basic federal standard deduction for an individual for whom a deduction under section 151 of the Internal Revenue Code is allowable to another taxpayer shall not be reduced below the minimum adjusted basic standard deduction provided by section 63 of the Internal Revenue Code.

§ 63-3022O. Adjustment — Property acquired after September 10, 2001 — Small business expenses — Limitations on assessments and refunds.

For taxable years commencing on and after January 1, 2001, in computing Idaho taxable income:

The adjusted basis of depreciable property, depreciation and gains and losses from sale, exchange or other disposition of depreciable property acquired after September 10, 2001, and before December 31, 2007, shall be computed without regard to subsection (k) of section 168 of the Internal Revenue Code and the adjusted basis of depreciable property, depreciation and gains and losses from sale, exchange or other disposition of depreciable property acquired after December 31, 2009, shall be computed without regard to subsection (k) of section 168 of the Internal Revenue Code; and

Adjustments in computing Idaho taxable income required by subsection (1) of this section shall be made without regard to loss limitations imposed by sections 465, 469, 704(d) and 1366(d) of the Internal Revenue Code; and

A taxpayer’s basis in an interest in a pass-through entity, amount at risk, and passive activity loss carryover shall be the same amount for purposes of the Idaho income tax act as the amount determined under the Internal Revenue Code; and

Each partner, shareholder, member or beneficiary shall include in Idaho taxable income his share of the adjustments required by this section in computing Idaho taxable income of any pass-through entity; and

Notwithstanding the provisions of sections 63-3068 and 63-3072, Idaho Code, the period of limitations for issuing a notice of deficiency determination or filing a claim for refund for any year for which an adjustment is required by this section shall not expire before three (3) years from the later of: (a) the due date of the return for the last taxable year an adjustment was required by this section, or (b) the date the return was filed for the last taxable year an adjustment was required by this section. Upon the expiration of the period of limitations as provided in subsections (a) and (m) of section 63-3068, Idaho Code, and subsections (b) and (h) of section 63-3072, Idaho Code, only those specific items of basis, deductions, gains or losses that are computed without regard to subsection (k) of section 168 of the Internal Revenue Code, as required by this section, shall be subject to adjustment, as well as the effect of such adjustments on Idaho credits, net operating loss deductions and capital loss carryovers.

§ 63-3022P. Health insurance costs.

With respect to an individual taxpayer, an amount equal to the amount paid by the taxpayer during the taxable year for insurance which constitutes medical care for the taxpayer, the spouse or dependents of the taxpayer which is not otherwise deducted or accounted for by the taxpayer for Idaho income tax purposes shall be allowed as a deduction for Idaho taxable income. As used in this section, “insurance which constitutes medical care” includes any hospital or medical policy or certificate, any subscriber contract, policies or certificates of insurance for specific disease, hospital confinement indemnity, accident-only, dental, vision, single employer self-funded coverage, meaning that portion of health insurance which is the retained risk of the employer, student health benefits only or coverage for medical care or treatment issued as a supplement to liability insurance. Employers shall provide to the employee a statement as to whether an employee’s contribution for health insurance has been excluded from taxable income.

§ 63-3022Q. Long-term care insurance.

For taxable years commencing on or after January 1, 2004, premiums paid during the taxable year, by a taxpayer for long-term care insurance as that term is defined in section 41-4603, Idaho Code, which long-term care insurance is to be for the benefit of the taxpayer, a dependent of the taxpayer or an employee of the taxpayer, may be deducted from taxable income to the extent that the premium is not otherwise deducted or accounted for by the taxpayer for Idaho income tax purposes.

§ 63-3022R. Certain loss recoveries.

If taxable income includes recovered amounts previously deducted from taxable income that were not allowed or allowable as a deduction from Idaho taxable income except as provided by this section, a deduction equal to the recovered amount shall be allowed in determining Idaho taxable income.

§ 63-3022S. Income earned on an Indian reservation.

A taxpayer who is an enrolled member of a federally recognized Indian tribe who resides on the reservation of the Coeur d’Alene tribe, the Kootenai tribe of Idaho, the Nez Perce tribe, the Shoshone-Bannock tribes of the Fort Hall reservation or the Shoshone-Paiute tribes of the Duck Valley reservation may deduct from taxable income an amount equal to the taxpayer’s income earned on the reservation of a tribe enumerated in this section, without regard to whether the reservation is the reservation of the tribe of which the taxpayer is an enrolled member.

§ 63-3022T. Relief from joint and several liability on joint return. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2017, ch. 20, § 2, effective July 1, 2017. For present comparable provisions, see§ 63-3050A.

§ 63-3022U. Deduction for certain charitable contributions.

A taxpayer may deduct from taxable income the amount by which the taxpayer must reduce a charitable contribution deduction under section 170(d)(1)(B) or 170(d)(2)(B) of the Internal Revenue Code. The amount allowed to a part-year resident or nonresident will be determined pursuant to section 63-3026A(6), Idaho Code. This deduction shall not apply to the calculation set forth in section 63-3022L, Idaho Code.

§ 63-3022V. Deduction for first-time home buyers.

As used in this section:

“Account holder” means an individual who resides in Idaho, who has filed an income tax return in Idaho for the most recent taxable year, who is a first-time home buyer, and who establishes, individually or jointly, a first-time home buyer savings account. A married individual living in Idaho who is also a first-time home buyer, filing separately, may be an account holder if the account is established separately from the person’s spouse. Married individuals filing jointly are considered the account holder if they both reside in Idaho, if at least one (1) of them has filed an income tax return in Idaho for the most recent taxable year, and if at least one (1) of them is a first-time home buyer.

“Commission” means the Idaho state tax commission.

“Depository” means a state or national bank, a savings and loan association, a credit union, or a trust company authorized to act as a fiduciary, authorized to do business in Idaho.

“Eligible home costs” means:
(d)(i) “Eligible home costs” means:

The down payment for the purchase of a single-family residence in Idaho; or

A cost, fee, tax, or payment incurred by, charged to, or assigned to an account holder for the purchase of a single-family residence in Idaho and listed on the statement of receipts and disbursements for the sale, including any statement prescribed by 12 CFR 1026.38, as amended.

“Eligible home costs” also includes any United States veterans administration funding fee incurred by, charged to, or assigned to a designated beneficiary in connection with a veterans administration home loan guaranty program.

“First-time home buyer” means an individual who resides in Idaho, who has filed an income tax return in Idaho for the most recent taxable year, and who does not own, either individually or jointly, a single-family or multifamily residence and who has never owned or purchased, either individually or jointly, a single-family residence in any location.

“First-time home buyer savings account” means an account established in Idaho with a depository to pay the eligible home costs of the account holder or to reimburse the account holder’s eligible home costs in connection with a qualified home purchase.

“Qualified home purchase” means, with respect to a first-time home buyer savings account, the purchase of a single-family residence in Idaho by the account holder on the date or after the date the account holder opened a first-time home buyer savings account.

“Single-family residence” means a residential dwelling owned and occupied, or under contract to be constructed, by an account holder as the account holder’s principal residence, including but not limited to a manufactured home, mobile home, condominium unit, or townhome.

For taxable years commencing on and after January 1, 2020, annual contributions and interest earned on a first-time home buyer savings account may be deducted from the taxable income of the account holder. Annual deductions shall not exceed fifteen thousand dollars ($15,000) per year for an individual or thirty thousand dollars ($30,000) per year for a married couple filing jointly. Annual contributions to a first-time home buyer savings account shall not exceed the amount deductible under this section. Interest earned on the account shall be tax deferred provided such funds are used for a qualified home purchase subject to this section.

The account holder shall be the beneficiary of the first-time home buyer savings account. The designation shall be made on forms provided by the commission during the year following the date on which the account is established.
(4) No withdrawals may be made from a first-time home buyer savings account within the first thirty (30) days from the establishment of the account. Thereafter, funds held in a first-time home buyer savings account may be withdrawn by the account holder at any time. Deposits into a first-time home buyer savings account shall not exceed one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) for the lifetime of the account. Withdrawals for the purpose of paying eligible home costs shall not be subject to the tax imposed in this chapter. The burden of proving that a withdrawal from a first-time home buyer savings account was made for an eligible home cost is solely upon the account holder. Other withdrawals shall be subject to the following:

The withdrawal of funds by the account holder for purposes other than the payment of eligible home costs shall be subject to taxes otherwise due.

The direct transfer of funds from a first-time home buyer savings account to another first-time home buyer savings account at a different depository shall not be considered a withdrawal for purposes of this section. Charges relating to the administration and maintenance of the account by the depository are not withdrawals for purposes of this section.

Funds deposited in a first-time home buyer savings account that are deposited in error or unintentionally and that are withdrawn within fifteen (15) days of being deposited shall be treated as if the amounts had not been deposited in the first-time home buyer savings account.

Funds withdrawn from a first-time home buyer savings account that are redeposited into a first-time home buyer savings account within fifteen (15) days of being withdrawn shall be treated as if the amounts had not been withdrawn from the first-time home buyer savings account.

Upon the death of an account holder, the account principal, as well as any interest accumulated thereon, shall be distributed without penalty to a beneficiary or beneficiaries designated by the account holder. Any taxes that are owing on the funds shall be paid by the beneficiary or beneficiaries.

(5) In the case of first-time home buyer savings accounts, account holders shall provide to the state tax commission, in the routine fashion used for all interest-bearing accounts, the same information that is provided for any interest-bearing bank account and shall also include an attestation under the penalty of perjury that the account holder is a first-time home buyer as defined in this section. To minimize the burden of reporting, the information shall be provided in the format in which information is provided for any interest-bearing bank account to the state tax commission. Depositories shall report withdrawals within ninety (90) days on a form provided by the commission. Account holders shall provide on any state income tax form in which they take a deduction for a first-time home buyer savings account the account number of their first-time home buyer savings account and the depository at which the account is held.

(6) First-time home buyer savings accounts shall be nontransferable to any person who is not the account holder.

(7) The commission shall promulgate rules to administer the provisions of this section.

§ 63-3023. Transacting business.

Subject only to the limitations of the constitutions of the United States and of the state of Idaho, the term “transacting business” shall include owning or leasing, whether as lessor or lessee, of any property, including real and personal property, located in this state, or engaging in or the transacting of any activity in this state, for the purpose of or resulting in economic or pecuniary gain or profit.

§ 63-3023A. No business situs. [Repealed.]

§ 63-3023B. Nonresident transportation employees. [Repealed.]